Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1653
Commissioner; file for injunctive relief; when.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any entity is or has been violating any of the provisions of the Private Postsecondary Career School Act or any of the lawful rules, regulations, or orders of the board or department, the commissioner may file a petition for injunction in the name of the department in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state against such entity for the purpose of enjoining such violation or for an order directing compliance with the provisions of the act and the rules, regulations, and orders. It shall not be necessary that the commissioner allege or prove that there is no adequate remedy at law. The right of injunction provided in this section shall be in addition to any other legal remedy which the department may have and shall be in addition to any right of criminal prosecution provided by law. The commissioner shall not obtain a temporary restraining order without notice to the entity affected. The pendency of board action with respect to alleged violations shall not operate as a bar to an action for injunctive relief pursuant to this section.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 58;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 52;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2858;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 53.